Nevada, session 83, AB80.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 548 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 12, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2. As used in sections 2 to 12, inclusive, of this act,
unless the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined
in sections 4, 5 and 5.5 of this act have the meanings ascribed to
them in those sections.
Sec. 3. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 4. “Commission” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 548.030.
Sec. 5. “Government” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 548.045.
Sec. 5.5. “Producer” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 576.018.
Sec. 6. (Deleted by amendment.)
-
*AB80_R1*

– 3 –
Sec. 7. 1. The Healthy Soils Initiative is hereby created
within the Commission. To the extent that money is available, the
Healthy Soils Initiative must, without limitation:
(a) Encourage the widespread adoption in quantity and acres
of soil health practices by producers;
(b) Promote and advance the understanding of the
environmental and economic benefits of soil health practices by
producers, policymakers, consumers and the general public; and
(c) Support and advance scientific research into soil health,
including, without limitation:
(1) The existing conditions of agricultural soils in this State
and the current carbon storage and carbon storage potential of
such soils;
(2) The environmental benefits of soil health practices; and
(3) The economic benefits of soil health practices.
2. In carrying out the requirements of subsection 1, the
Commission may:
(a) Provide incentives to encourage the implementation of soil
health practices;
(b) Conduct educational and outreach programs on the
benefits of soil health;
(c) Evaluate and develop soil health sampling and testing
protocols that are appropriate for the agricultural systems in this
State;
(d) Facilitate stakeholder collaboration to advance the
understanding of the science of soil health and the
implementation of soil health practices, which may include,
without limitation, collaboration between the government, Indian
tribes, academic and research institutions, nonprofit organizations
and private entities;
(e) Collaborate with producers, groups of producers, producer
cooperatives, conservation districts, water conservancy districts,
academic and research institutions, the government, Indian tribes
and any other entity; and
(f) Enter into agreements or contracts.
Sec. 8. 1. In addition to the requirements of section 7 of
this act, as part of the Healthy Soils Initiative, the Commission
may establish:
(a) A program to distribute, within the limits of legislative
appropriations and other available money, grants of money to
eligible entities to engage in soil health activities or projects,
including, without limitation, research, education or
demonstration projects. In developing such a grant program, the
Commission:
-
*AB80_R1*

– 4 –
(1) Shall prioritize distributing such grants to conservation
districts that are working with producers, if appropriate, as
determined by the Commission; and
(2) May prioritize the needs of historically underserved
producers, emerging areas of scientific inquiry and research,
environmental benefits or any other consideration the
Commission determines is appropriate.
(b) A soil health monitoring and inventory platform.
(c) Any other program the Commission determines is
appropriate.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, any program
or platform established by the Commission pursuant to subsection
1 must be voluntary and incentive-based. Such a program may
not:
(a) Require the participation of a producer or other entity;
(b) Mandate the implementation of soil health practices by
producers or other entities who do not participate; or
(c) Bind a participant to execute specific practice standards in
adverse climate conditions or circumstances with limited or no
chance of success or that would cause irreparable physical or
economic harm to the operations of the participant.
3. If a grant program is established pursuant to paragraph
(a) of subsection 1, the Commission shall adopt regulations to
carry out the grant program, which must, without limitation:
(a) Set forth the entities that are eligible to receive grants;
(b) Require any grant recipient who does not have sufficient
expertise in soil health practices or project management to work
with a technical assistance agency or organization;
(c) Require each grant recipient to:
(1) Conduct outreach and education activities regarding the
soil health activity or project; and
(2) Disclose information relating to the soil health activity
or project;
(d) Ensure that the most accurate and current scientific
evidence relating to soil health, soil health practices and the
economic and environmental benefits of soil health practices is
considered in awarding a grant by the program;
(e) Limit the grant money that may be used by a grant
recipient for costs not directly related to the purpose of the grant,
including, without limitation, administrative expenses and
overhead expenses;
(f) Establish monitoring requirements to ensure that any grant
money awarded is spent in accordance with state law; and
(g) Establish requirements to ensure the confidentiality of a
grant recipient, landowner and land information, as applicable.
-
*AB80_R1*

– 5 –
Sec. 9. 1. There is hereby created in the State Treasury the
Fund for Soil Health. The Commission is responsible for the
administration of the Fund. All money received and held by
the State Treasurer for that purpose must be deposited in the
Fund.
2. The Commission may:
(a) Apply for and accept gifts, grants, services and donations
from any source for the purposes of carrying out the provisions of
sections 2 to 12, inclusive, of this act;
(b) Administer and expend money for the purpose of planning,
developing or establishing the Healthy Soils Initiative pursuant to
sections 7 and 8 of this act; and
(c) Use money received or appropriated as matching funds to
obtain or make grants for soil health activities.
Sec. 10. Except as otherwise provided in this section or
pursuant to a grant agreement executed in relation to a program
established pursuant to section 8 of this act, all information in the
records and files of the Commission regarding the identity of a
producer or participant in a program established by the
Commission pursuant to sections 2 to 12, inclusive, of this act and
the practices of the producer or program participant are
confidential unless the producer or program participant provides
express permission in writing to the Commission to release such
information.
Sec. 11. To the extent that money is available, the
Conservation Districts Program in the State Department of
Conservation and Natural Resources shall provide staff services to
the Commission for carrying out the provisions of sections 2 to 12,
inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 12. The Commission may adopt regulations to carry out
the provisions of sections 2 to 12, inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 13. NRS 548.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
548.010 [This chapter] NRS 548.010 to 548.550, inclusive,
may be known and cited as the Conservation Districts Law.
Sec. 14. NRS 548.015 is hereby amended to read as follows:
548.015 As used in [this chapter,] NRS 548.010 to 548.550,
inclusive, unless the context otherwise requires, the [following]
words and terms [have the meanings attributed to them] defined in
NRS 548.020 to 548.090, inclusive, [unless the context otherwise
requires.] have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 15. NRS 548.032 is hereby amended to read as follows:
548.032 “Conservation district” or “district” means a
governmental subdivision of this State, and a public body corporate
and politic, organized in accordance with the provisions of [this
chapter] NRS 548.010 to 548.550, inclusive, for the purposes, with
-
*AB80_R1*

– 6 –
the powers, and subject to the restrictions set forth in [this chapter.]
NRS 548.010 to 548.550, inclusive.
Sec. 16. NRS 548.050 is hereby amended to read as follows:
548.050 “Land occupier” or “occupier of land” means any
person, firm or corporation which holds title to, or is in legal
possession of, any lands lying within a district organized under the
provisions of [this chapter,] NRS 548.010 to 548.550, inclusive,
whether as owner or as lessee or tenant under a lease or rental
agreement for a term of 1 year or longer, but does not include
transient users.
Sec. 17. NRS 548.085 is hereby amended to read as follows:
548.085 “Supervisor” means one of the members of the
governing body of a district, elected or appointed in accordance with
the provisions of [this chapter.] NRS 548.010 to 548.550, inclusive.
Sec. 18. NRS 548.157 is hereby amended to read as follows:
548.157 The Program shall perform staff services for the
Commission in carrying out its responsibilities under [this chapter.]
the provisions of NRS 548.010 to 548.550, inclusive.
Sec. 19. NRS 548.160 is hereby amended to read as follows:
548.160 The Commission may adopt and promulgate such
rules and regulations as may be necessary for the execution of its
functions under [this chapter.] the provisions of NRS 548.010 to
548.550, inclusive.
Sec. 20. NRS 548.175 is hereby amended to read as follows:
548.175 The Commission has the following duties and powers:
1. To carry out the policies of this State in programs at the state
level for the conservation of the renewable natural resources of this
State and to represent the State in matters affecting such resources.
2. To offer such assistance as may be appropriate to the
supervisors of conservation districts in the carrying out of any of
their powers and programs, to propose programs and to assist and
guide districts in the preparation and carrying out of programs
authorized under [this chapter,] the provisions of NRS 548.010 to
548.550, inclusive, to review district programs, to coordinate the
programs of the districts and resolve any conflicts in such programs,
and to facilitate, promote, assist, harmonize, coordinate and guide
the programs and activities of districts as they relate to other special-
purpose districts, counties and other public agencies.
3. To keep the supervisors of each of the districts informed of
the activities and experience of all other districts organized pursuant
to [this chapter,] NRS 548.010 to 548.550, inclusive, and to
facilitate an interchange of advice and experience among those
districts and promote cooperation among them.
-
*AB80_R1*

– 7 –
4. To secure the cooperation and assistance of the United
States, any of its agencies and of other agencies of this State in the
work of conservation districts.
5. To serve, along with conservation districts, as the official
state agency for cooperating with the Natural Resources
Conservation Service of the United States Department of
Agriculture in carrying on conservation operations within the
boundaries of conservation districts as created under [this chapter.]
the provisions of NRS 548.010 to 548.550, inclusive.
6. To enlist the cooperation and collaboration of state, federal,
interstate, local, public and private agencies with the conservation
districts and to facilitate arrangements under which the conservation
districts may serve county governing bodies and other agencies as
their local operating agencies in the administration of any activity
concerned with the conservation and use of renewable natural
resources.
7. To make available, with the assistance of the Program,
information concerning the needs and the work of the districts and
the Commission to the Director of the State Department of
Conservation and Natural Resources, the Legislature, executive
agencies and political subdivisions of this State, cooperating federal
agencies and the general public.
8. To cooperate with and give such assistance as may be
requested by cities, counties, irrigation districts, and other special-
purpose districts in the State of Nevada for the purpose of
cooperating with the United States through the Secretary of
Agriculture in the furtherance of conservation, pursuant to the
provisions of the Watershed Protection and Flood Prevention Act,
16 U.S.C. §§ 1001 et seq., and the requirements of other special
programs of the United States Department of Agriculture.
9. Pursuant to procedures developed mutually by the
Commission and federal, state and local agencies that are authorized
to plan or administer activities significantly affecting the
conservation and use of renewable natural resources, to receive from
those agencies, for review and comment, suitable descriptions of
their plans, programs and activities for purposes of coordination
with the conservation districts’ programs and to arrange for and
participate in conferences necessary to avoid conflict among the
plans and programs, to call attention to omissions and to avoid
duplication of effort.
10. To submit, with the assistance of the Program, a report to
the Director of the State Department of Conservation and Natural
Resources whenever the Commission determines that there exists a
substantial conflict between the program of a district and the
proposed plans or activities directly affecting the conservation of
-
*AB80_R1*

– 8 –
natural resources prepared by any other local governmental unit or
agency of this State.
11. By administrative order of the Commission, upon the
written request of the board of supervisors of the conservation
district or districts involved, with a showing that the request has
been approved by a majority vote of the members of each of the
boards involved:
(a) To transfer lands from one district established under the
provisions of [this chapter] NRS 548.010 to 548.550, inclusive, to
another.
(b) To divide a single district into two or more districts, each of
which must, thereafter, operate as a separate district under the
provisions of [this chapter.] NRS 548.010 to 548.550, inclusive.
(c) To consolidate two or more districts established under the
provisions of [this chapter] NRS 548.010 to 548.550, inclusive, into
a single district under the provisions of [this chapter.] NRS 548.010
to 548.550, inclusive.
(d) To inform the Program of any action taken pursuant to this
subsection for its approval of any new name and the appropriate
entry in the Program’s records of the changes made.
12. To authorize the change of name of any district, upon
receipt by the Commission of a resolution by the board of
supervisors of the district for such a change and to present the
resolution to the Program for processing and recording in
accordance with the provisions of NRS 548.240.
13. To apply for any available grants and to accept and use any
grants, gifts or donations to make available grants of money to
qualified conservation districts to aid the districts in carrying out the
provisions of [this chapter.] NRS 548.010 to 548.550, inclusive.
Sec. 21. NRS 548.178 is hereby amended to read as follows:
548.178 1. The Commission may establish programs for
distributing, within the limits of legislative appropriations and other
available money, grants of money to conservation districts.
Distribution of such grants must be made in the following manner:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, the
Commission shall distribute grants of money provided by legislative
appropriation in equal amounts to each conservation district which
the Commission determines qualifies for a grant.
(b) The Commission may distribute grants of money provided
by sources other than legislative appropriation in such amounts and
subject to such conditions as the Commission determines
appropriate to any conservation district which the Commission
determines qualifies for a grant.
-
*AB80_R1*

– 9 –
2. The Commission may determine that a conservation district
qualifies for a grant of money pursuant to this section if the district
demonstrates to the satisfaction of the Commission that the district:
(a) Has been established in accordance with the provisions of
[this chapter;] NRS 548.010 to 548.550, inclusive; and
(b) Is in compliance with all of the requirements of [this chapter]
NRS 548.010 to 548.550, inclusive, and the regulations of the
Commission adopted pursuant thereto.
3. Except as may otherwise be provided as a condition of a
grant of money distributed by the Commission pursuant to
paragraph (b) of subsection 1, a conservation district that is awarded
a grant of money pursuant to this section may use the money for
reasonable and necessary expenses incurred by the district in
carrying out its duties and authorities in accordance with [this
chapter] the provisions of NRS 548.010 to 548.550, inclusive, and
the annual district budget approved by the Commission.
4. With regard to money provided by legislative appropriation,
the Commission may distribute grants of money to conservation
districts in unequal amounts if:
(a) The grants of money are for a specific competitive grant
program for which the Legislature expressly appropriated money;
and
(b) The competitive grant program described in paragraph (a) is
governed by regulations specifically adopted to govern that
competitive grant program and those regulations expressly state that
the grants of money may be distributed in unequal amounts.
5. The Commission may adopt such regulations as it considers
necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.
Sec. 22. NRS 548.190 is hereby amended to read as follows:
548.190 1. Within 30 days after such a petition has been filed
with the Commission, it shall cause due notice to be given of a
proposed hearing upon:
(a) The question of the desirability and necessity, in the interest
of the public health, safety and welfare, of the creation of such
district.
(b) The question of the appropriate boundaries to be assigned to
such district.
(c) The propriety of the petition and other proceedings taken
under [this chapter.] the provisions of NRS 548.010 to 548.550,
inclusive.
(d) All questions relevant to such inquiries.
2. All occupiers of land within the limits of the territory
described in the petition, and of lands within any territory
considered for addition to such described territory, and all other
-
*AB80_R1*

– 10 –
interested persons, shall have the right to attend such hearings and to
be heard.
3. If it shall appear upon the hearing that it may be desirable to
include, within the proposed district, territory outside of the area
within which due notice of the hearing has been given, the hearing
shall be adjourned and due notice of further hearing shall be given
throughout the entire area considered for inclusion in the district,
and such further hearing shall be held.
Sec. 23. NRS 548.195 is hereby amended to read as follows:
548.195 1. After such hearing, if the Commission
determines, upon the facts presented at such hearing and upon such
other relevant facts and information as may be available, that there
is need, in the interest of the public health, safety and welfare, for a
conservation district to function in the territory considered at the
hearing, the Commission shall make and record such determination,
and shall determine the township or townships to be included in the
district.
2. In making such determination, the Commission shall give
due weight and consideration to:
(a) The topography of the area considered and of the State.
(b) The composition of soils therein.
(c) The distribution of erosion.
(d) The prevailing land use practices.
(e) The desirability and necessity of including within the
boundaries the particular lands under consideration and the benefits
such lands may receive from being included within such boundaries.
(f) The relation of the proposed area to existing watersheds and
agricultural regions, and to other conservation districts already
organized or proposed for organization under the provisions of [this
chapter.] NRS 548.010 to 548.550, inclusive.
(g) Such other physical, geographical and economic factors as
are relevant, having due regard to the legislative determinations set
forth in NRS 548.095 to 548.113, inclusive.
3. After consideration of the petition and of any other evidence
of interest in the organization of a district, and of the relevant factors
regarding the need for a district to function in the territory being
considered, the Commission may make the determination of such
need without holding a hearing.
Sec. 24. NRS 548.205 is hereby amended to read as follows:
548.205 1. After the Commission has made and recorded a
determination that there is need, in the interest of the public health,
safety and welfare, for the organization of a district in a particular
territory and has determined the township or townships to be
included, the Commission shall consider the question whether the
operation of a district within such territory with the powers
-
*AB80_R1*

– 11 –
conferred upon conservation districts in [this chapter] NRS 548.010
to 548.550, inclusive, is administratively practicable and feasible.
2. To assist the Commission in the determination of such
administrative practicability and feasibility, the Commission shall,
within a reasonable time after entry of the finding that there is need
for the organization of the proposed district and the determination of
its territory, hold a referendum within the proposed district upon the
proposition of the creation of the district, and shall cause due notice
of such referendum to be given.
3. The question shall be submitted by ballots upon which the
words “For creation of a conservation district consisting of
the township (or townships) of ........................ in the county (or
counties) of ........................” and “Against creation of a
conservation district consisting of the township (or townships)
of ........................ in the county (or counties) of ........................”
shall be printed, with a square before each proposition and a
direction to insert an X mark in the square before one or the other of
the propositions, as the voter may favor or oppose creation of such
district.
4. All persons determined by the county clerk or clerks to be
registered voters residing within the boundaries of the proposed
conservation district shall be eligible to vote in such referendum.
Sec. 25. NRS 548.210 is hereby amended to read as follows:
548.210 1. The Commission shall:
(a) Pay all expenses for the issuance of such notices and the
conduct of such hearings and referendum.
(b) Supervise the conduct of such hearings and referendum.
(c) Issue appropriate regulations governing the conduct of such
hearings and referendum, and providing for the registration prior to
the date of the referendum of all eligible voters, or prescribing some
other appropriate procedure for the determination of those eligible
as voters in such referendum.
2. No informalities in the conduct of such referendum or in any
matters relating thereto shall invalidate the referendum or the result
thereof if notice thereof shall have been given substantially as
provided in [this chapter] NRS 548.010 to 548.550, inclusive, and
the referendum shall have been fairly conducted.
Sec. 26. NRS 548.215 is hereby amended to read as follows:
548.215 1. The Commission shall publish the result of the
referendum and shall thereafter consider and determine whether the
operation of the district is administratively practicable and feasible.
2. If the Commission determines that the operation of such
district is not administratively practicable and feasible, the
Commission shall record such determination and deny the petition.
-
*AB80_R1*

– 12 –
3. If the Commission determines that the operation of the
district is administratively practicable and feasible, the Commission
shall record such determination and shall proceed with the
organization of the district in the manner provided in [this chapter.]
the provisions of NRS 548.010 to 548.550, inclusive. The
Commission shall not determine that the operation of the proposed
district is administratively practicable and feasible unless at least a
majority of the votes cast in the referendum upon the creation of the
district are cast in favor of the creation of such district.
4. In making such determination, the Commission shall give
due regard and weight to:
(a) The attitudes of the occupiers of lands lying within the
defined boundaries.
(b) The number of eligible registered voters who voted in the
referendum.
(c) The proportion of the votes cast in such referendum in favor
of the creation of the district to the total number of votes cast.
(d) The approximate wealth and income of the land occupiers of
the proposed district.
(e) The probable expense of carrying on erosion-control
operations within such district.
(f) Such other economic and social factors as may be relevant to
such determination, having due regard to the legislative
determinations set forth in NRS 548.095 to 548.113, inclusive.
Sec. 27. NRS 548.220 is hereby amended to read as follows:
548.220 After 6 months shall have expired from the date of
entry of a determination by the Commission that operation of a
proposed district is not administratively practicable and feasible, and
denial of a petition pursuant to such determination, subsequent
petitions may be filed and action taken thereon in accordance with
the provisions of [this chapter.] NRS 548.010 to 548.550, inclusive.
Sec. 28. NRS 548.235 is hereby amended to read as follows:
548.235 1. The five appointed supervisors shall present to the
Program an application signed by them, which states:
(a) That a petition for the creation of the district was filed with
the Commission pursuant to the provisions of [this chapter,] NRS
548.010 to 548.550, inclusive, and that the proceedings specified in
[this chapter] NRS 548.010 to 548.550, inclusive, were taken
pursuant to that petition.
(b) That the application is being filed in order to complete the
organization of the district as a governmental subdivision and a
public body, corporate and politic, under [this chapter.] the
provisions of NRS 548.010 to 548.550, inclusive.
(c) That the Commission has appointed them as supervisors.
-
*AB80_R1*

– 13 –
(d) The name and official residence of each of the supervisors,
together with a certified copy of the appointments evidencing their
right to office.
(e) The term of office of each of the supervisors.
(f) The name which is proposed for the district.
(g) The location of the principal office of the supervisors of the
district.
2. The application must be subscribed and sworn to by each of
the supervisors before a person authorized to take and certify oaths,
who shall certify upon the application that the person personally
knows the supervisors and knows them to be the officers as affirmed
in the application, and that each has subscribed thereto in the
officer’s presence.
3. The application must be accompanied by a statement by the
Commission:
(a) That a petition was filed, notice issued and hearing held as
required by [this chapter.] the provisions of NRS 548.010 to
548.550, inclusive.
(b) That the Commission did determine that there is need, in the
interest of the public health, safety and welfare, for a conservation
district to function in the proposed territory and did define the
township or townships to be included.
(c) That notice was given and a referendum held on the question
of the creation of such a district, and that a majority of the votes cast
in such referendum were in favor of the creation of the district.
(d) That thereafter the Commission did determine that the
operation of the proposed district is administratively practicable and
feasible.
4. The statement must set forth the township or townships to be
included.
Sec. 29. NRS 548.240 is hereby amended to read as follows:
548.240 1. The Program shall examine the application and
statement, and if the Program finds that the name proposed for the
district is not identical with that of any other conservation district of
this State or so nearly similar as to lead to confusion or uncertainty,
the Program shall record them in an appropriate book of record.
2. If the Program finds that the name proposed for the district
is identical with that of any other conservation district of this State,
or so nearly similar as to lead to confusion and uncertainty, the
Program shall notify the Commission. The Commission shall
thereupon submit a new name for the district. Upon receipt of a new
name, free of such defects, the Program shall record the application
and statement, with the name so modified, in an appropriate book of
record.
-
*AB80_R1*

– 14 –
3. When the application and statement have been recorded, the
district becomes a governmental subdivision of this State and a
public body corporate and politic.
4. The Program shall make and issue to the supervisors a
certificate, over the signature of a member of the staff of the
Program, of the organization of the district.
5. The boundaries of the district must include the territory
determined by the Commission, but must not include any area
included within the boundaries of another conservation district
organized under the provisions of [this chapter.] NRS 548.010 to
548.550, inclusive.
Sec. 30. NRS 548.245 is hereby amended to read as follows:
548.245 1. In any suit, action or proceeding involving the
validity or enforcement of, or relating to, any contract, proceeding
or action of the district, the district shall be deemed to have been
established in accordance with the provisions of [this chapter] NRS
548.010 to 548.550, inclusive, upon proof of the issuance of the
certificate by the Program.
2. A copy of such a certificate issued by the Program is
admissible in evidence in any such suit, action or proceeding and is
proof of the contents thereof.
Sec. 31. NRS 548.280 is hereby amended to read as follows:
548.280 Each district shall be governed by a board consisting
of five supervisors elected at large and one or more appointed
supervisors, as provided in [this chapter.] the provisions of NRS
548.010 to 548.550, inclusive.
Sec. 32. NRS 548.330 is hereby amended to read as follows:
548.330 The supervisors shall furnish to the Commission, upon
request:
1. Copies of such ordinances, rules, regulations, orders,
contracts, forms and other documents as they shall adopt or employ;
and
2. Such other information concerning their activities as the
Commission may require in the performance of its duties under [this
chapter.] the provisions of NRS 548.010 to 548.550, inclusive.
Sec. 33. NRS 548.340 is hereby amended to read as follows:
548.340 A conservation district organized under the provisions
of [this chapter] NRS 548.010 to 548.550, inclusive, shall constitute
a governmental subdivision of this State and a public body corporate
and politic, exercising public powers.
Sec. 34. NRS 548.345 is hereby amended to read as follows:
548.345 In addition to other powers granted in [this chapter,]
the provisions of NRS 548.010 to 548.550, inclusive, a district and
the supervisors thereof shall have the power to conduct surveys,
investigations and research relating to the conservation of renewable
-
*AB80_R1*

– 15 –
natural resources and the preventive and control measures needed,
to publish the results of such surveys, investigations or research, and
to disseminate information concerning such preventive and control
measures; but in order to avoid duplication of research activities, no
district shall initiate any research program except in cooperation
with the government of this State or any of its agencies, or with the
United States or any of its agencies.
Sec. 35. NRS 548.350 is hereby amended to read as follows:
548.350 In addition to other powers granted in [this chapter,]
the provisions of NRS 548.010 to 548.550, inclusive, a district and
the supervisors thereof shall have the power to conduct
demonstrational projects within the district on lands owned or
controlled by this State or any of its agencies, with the cooperation
of the agency administering and having jurisdiction thereof, and on
any other lands within the district, upon obtaining the consent of the
occupier of such lands or the necessary rights or interests in such
lands, in order to demonstrate by example the means, methods and
measures by which renewable natural resources may be conserved.
Sec. 36. NRS 548.355 is hereby amended to read as follows:
548.355 In addition to other powers granted in [this chapter,]
the provisions of NRS 548.010 to 548.550, inclusive, a district and
the supervisors thereof may:
1. Carry out preventive and control measures within the
district, including, but not limited to, engineering operations,
methods of cultivation, the growing of vegetation and changes in the
use of land; and
2. Repair and restore property within the district, including, but
not limited to, wetlands, stream corridors and other riparian
property,
 on land owned or controlled by any government or municipal
corporation, with the cooperation of the agency administering and
having jurisdiction thereof, and on any other land within the district,
upon obtaining the consent of all persons holding any relevant rights
or interests in such land.
Sec. 37. NRS 548.360 is hereby amended to read as follows:
548.360 In addition to other powers granted in [this chapter,]
the provisions of NRS 548.010 to 548.550, inclusive, a district and
the supervisors thereof may cooperate or enter into agreements with
and, within the limits of appropriations made available to it by law
and any money it acquires from any other source, furnish financial
or other aid to any governmental or other agency, or any occupier of
land within the district, in conserving renewable natural resources
within the district, subject to such conditions as the supervisors may
deem necessary to advance the purposes of [this chapter.] NRS
548.010 to 548.550, inclusive.
-
*AB80_R1*

– 16 –
Sec. 38. NRS 548.365 is hereby amended to read as follows:
548.365 In addition to other powers granted in [this chapter,]
the provisions of NRS 548.010 to 548.550, inclusive, a district and
the supervisors thereof shall have the power to make available, on
such terms as it shall prescribe, to land occupiers within the district,
agricultural and engineering machinery and equipment, fertilizer,
seeds and seedlings, and such other material or equipment as will
assist such land occupiers in carrying on operations upon their lands
for the conservation of renewable natural resources.
Sec. 39. NRS 548.370 is hereby amended to read as follows:
548.370 In addition to other powers granted in [this chapter,]
the provisions of NRS 548.010 to 548.550, inclusive, a district and
the supervisors thereof shall have the power to construct, operate,
improve and maintain such facilities and structures as may be
necessary or convenient for the performance of any of the
operations authorized in [this chapter.] NRS 548.010 to 548.550,
inclusive.
Sec. 40. NRS 548.375 is hereby amended to read as follows:
548.375 In addition to other powers granted in [this chapter,]
the provisions of NRS 548.010 to 548.550, inclusive, a district and
the supervisors thereof shall have the power:
1. To develop comprehensive plans for the conservation of
renewable natural resources within the district, which plans shall
specify in such detail as may be possible the acts, procedures,
performances, and avoidances which are necessary or desirable for
the effectuation of such plans, including the specification of
engineering operations, methods of cultivation, the growing of
vegetation, cropping programs, tillage practices, and changes in the
use of land; and
2. To publish such plans and information and bring them to the
attention of occupiers of lands within the district.
Sec. 41. NRS 548.380 is hereby amended to read as follows:
548.380 In addition to other powers granted in [this chapter,]
the provisions of NRS 548.010 to 548.550, inclusive, a district and
the supervisors thereof may:
1. Manage or administer any project for the conservation of a
renewable natural resource located within its boundaries undertaken
by any person, municipal corporation or government.
2. Act as an agent of any person, municipal corporation or
government in connection with the acquisition, construction,
operation or administration of any project for the conservation of a
renewable natural resource within its boundaries.
3. Accept donations, gifts and contributions in money, services,
materials or any other form from any source, and use or expend such
-
*AB80_R1*

– 17 –
money, services, materials or other contributions in carrying on its
operations.
4. Participate in cost-sharing on federally financed projects.
Sec. 42. NRS 548.385 is hereby amended to read as follows:
548.385 In addition to other powers granted in [this chapter,]
the provisions of NRS 548.010 to 548.550, inclusive, a district and
the supervisors thereof shall have the power:
1. To sue and be sued in the name of the district.
2. To have a seal, which seal shall be judicially noticed.
3. To have perpetual succession, unless terminated as provided
in [this chapter.] the provisions of NRS 548.010 to 548.550,
inclusive.
4. To make and execute contracts and other instruments
necessary or convenient to the exercise of its powers.
5. To make, and from time to time amend and repeal, rules and
regulations not inconsistent with [this chapter,] the provisions of
NRS 548.010 to 548.550, inclusive, to carry into effect its purposes
and powers.
Sec. 43. NRS 548.390 is hereby amended to read as follows:
548.390 As a condition to the extending of any benefits under
[this chapter] the provisions of NRS 548.010 to 548.550, inclusive,
to, or the performance of work upon, any lands not owned or
controlled by this State or any of its agencies, the supervisors may
require contributions in money, services, materials or otherwise to
any operations conferring such benefits, and may require land
occupiers to enter into and perform such agreements or covenants as
to the permanent use of such lands as will tend to prevent or control
erosion thereon.
Sec. 44. NRS 548.393 is hereby amended to read as follows:
548.393 In addition to other powers granted in [this chapter,]
the provisions of NRS 548.010 to 548.550, inclusive, a district and
the supervisors thereof may, in furtherance of the purposes and
provisions of [this chapter:] NRS 548.010 to 548.550, inclusive:
1. Obtain options upon and acquire, by purchase, exchange,
lease, gift, grant, bequest, devise or otherwise, except by adverse
possession, any property, real or personal, or rights or interests
therein;
2. Maintain, administer and improve any properties acquired;
3. Receive income from such properties and expend that
income; and
4. Sell, lease or otherwise dispose of any of its property or
interests therein.
Sec. 45. NRS 548.395 is hereby amended to read as follows:
548.395 No provisions with respect to the acquisition,
operation or disposition of property by other public bodies shall be
-
*AB80_R1*

– 18 –
applicable to a district organized under [this chapter] the provisions
of NRS 548.010 to 548.550, inclusive, unless the Legislature shall
specifically so state.
Sec. 46. NRS 548.400 is hereby amended to read as follows:
548.400 1. The supervisors of any two or more districts
organized under the provisions of [this chapter] NRS 548.010 to
548.550, inclusive, may cooperate with and enter into agreements
with one another in the exercise of any or all powers conferred in
[this chapter.] NRS 548.010 to 548.550, inclusive.
2. Any district may enter into such agreements with a district
or districts in adjoining states to carry out such purposes if the law
in the other states permits the districts in the states to enter into the
agreements.
Sec. 47. NRS 548.405 is hereby amended to read as follows:
548.405 1. Agencies of this State which shall have
jurisdiction over, or be charged with the administration of, any state-
owned lands, and agencies of any county or other governmental
subdivision of the State which shall have jurisdiction over, or be
charged with the administration of, any county-owned or other
publicly owned lands, lying within the boundaries of any district
organized under [this chapter,] the provisions of NRS 548.010 to
548.550, inclusive, shall cooperate to the fullest extent with the
supervisors of such districts in the effectuation of programs and
operations undertaken by the supervisors under the provisions of
[this chapter.] NRS 548.010 to 548.550, inclusive.
2. The supervisors of such districts shall be given free access to
enter and perform work upon such publicly owned lands.
3. The provisions of land use regulations adopted pursuant to
NRS 548.410 to 548.435, inclusive, shall have the force and effect
of law over all such publicly owned lands, and shall be in all
respects observed by the agencies administering such lands.
Sec. 48. NRS 548.4052 is hereby amended to read as follows:
548.4052 1. Subject to the provisions of NRS 548.4053 and
548.4054, and only after receiving the approval of a majority of the
registered voters of the conservation district voting on the question
at a primary, general or special election held pursuant to NRS
548.4053 or at an election conducted by mail pursuant to
NRS 548.4054:
(a) If a conservation district includes land lying in only one
county, the board of county commissioners of the county shall
impose, on behalf of the conservation district, an annual fee of not
more than $25 on each parcel in the conservation district; and
(b) If a conservation district includes land lying in more than
one county, the boards of county commissioners of the respective
counties shall impose, on behalf of the conservation district, an
-
*AB80_R1*

– 19 –
annual fee of not more than $25 on each parcel in the conservation
district.
2. A fee imposed pursuant to subsection 1 must be collected as
are other fees and taxes imposed by the board of county
commissioners are collected. A board of county commissioners that
imposes the fee shall establish a separate fund in the county treasury
for the receipt and expenditure of and accounting for the proceeds of
the fee.
3. Money collected pursuant to this section may be used only
for the purposes of [this chapter.] NRS 548.010 to 548.550,
inclusive.
Sec. 49. NRS 548.410 is hereby amended to read as follows:
548.410 1. The supervisors of any district may file petitions
with the Commission at any time to request it to formulate land use
regulations applicable to the district.
2. The Commission shall prescribe the form of the petition,
which shall be, as nearly as practicable, in the form prescribed in
[this chapter] the provisions of NRS 548.010 to 548.550, inclusive,
for petitions to organize a district.
3. The Commission shall have authority to formulate
regulations, based upon the petition, governing the use of lands
within a district in the interest of conserving renewable natural
resources and preventing and controlling soil erosion and
sedimentation.
4. The Commission shall conduct, after due notice, public
meetings and public hearings within the district or districts
concerned upon such regulations as it deems necessary to assist it in
consideration thereof.
5. The Commission shall determine, on the basis of
information presented in the petition or brought out in public
hearings, and on the basis of the number of petitioners in relation to
the total number of occupiers of land lying within the district,
whether it can render a reasonable determination of approval or
denial of the petition without holding a referendum, or whether a
referendum shall be held.
Sec. 50. NRS 548.415 is hereby amended to read as follows:
548.415 If a referendum is to be held:
1. The proposed regulations shall be embodied in a proposed
ordinance.
2. Copies of such proposed ordinance shall be available for the
inspection of all eligible voters during the period between
publication of such notice and the date of the referendum.
3. The notices of the referendum shall recite the contents of
such proposed ordinance, or shall state where copies of such
proposed ordinance can be examined.
-
*AB80_R1*

– 20 –
4. The question shall be submitted by ballots, upon which the
words “For approval of proposed ordinance No. ........, prescribing
land use regulations for conservation of soil and prevention of
erosion” and “Against approval of proposed ordinance No. ........,
prescribing land use regulations for conservation of soil and
prevention of erosion” shall be printed, with a square before each
proposition and a direction to insert an X mark in the square before
one or the other of the propositions as the voter may favor or oppose
approval of such proposed ordinance.
5. The Commission shall supervise such referendum, shall
prescribe appropriate regulations governing the conduct thereof, and
shall publish the result thereof.
6. All persons determined by the county clerk or clerks to be
registered voters residing within the district are eligible to vote in
such referendum.
7. No informalities in the conduct of such referendum or in any
matters relating thereto invalidate the referendum or the result
thereof if notice thereof was given substantially as provided in [this
chapter] the provisions of NRS 548.010 to 548.550, inclusive, and
the referendum was fairly conducted.
Sec. 51. NRS 548.495 is hereby amended to read as follows:
548.495 1. The board of adjustment shall adopt rules to
govern its procedures, which rules shall be in accordance with the
provisions of [this chapter] NRS 548.010 to 548.550, inclusive, and
with the provisions of any ordinance adopted pursuant to
NRS 548.460.
2. The board shall keep a full and accurate record of all
proceedings, of all documents filed with it, and of all orders entered,
which shall be filed in the office of the board and shall be a public
record.
Sec. 52. NRS 548.515 is hereby amended to read as follows:
548.515 1. Petitions for including additional territory within
an existing district shall be filed with the Commission.
2. The proceedings provided for in [this chapter] the provisions
of NRS 548.010 to 548.550, inclusive, in the case of petitions to
organize a district shall be observed in the case of petitions for
inclusion, except that the application for a certificate of inclusion
shall be signed by the chair and the secretary of the governing body
of the district into which the additional territory is to be included.
3. The Commission shall prescribe the form for the petitions,
which shall be, as nearly as practicable, in the form prescribed in
[this chapter] the provisions of NRS 548.010 to 548.550, inclusive,
for petitions to organize a district.
4. Where the total number of land occupiers in the area
proposed for inclusion shall be less than 25, the petition may be
-
*AB80_R1*

– 21 –
filed when signed by a majority of the occupiers of such area, and in
such case no referendum need be held.
5. In referenda upon petitions for inclusion, all occupiers of
land lying within the proposed additional area shall be eligible to
vote.
6. The Commission shall determine whether or not such
inclusion shall be made.
Sec. 53. NRS 548.520 is hereby amended to read as follows:
548.520 1. Petitions to withdraw lands from a district may be
filed with the Commission at any time.
2. The Commission shall prescribe the form of the petition,
which shall be, as nearly as practicable, in the form prescribed in
[this chapter] the provisions of NRS 548.010 to 548.550, inclusive,
for petitions to organize a district.
3. Where the total number of land occupiers in the area
affected by a proposed withdrawal will be less than 25, the petition
may be filed when signed by a majority of the occupiers of such
area, and in such case no referendum need be held.
4. In referenda upon petitions for withdrawal, all occupiers of
land lying within the area affected by the proposed change in
boundary shall be eligible to vote.
5. The Commission shall determine whether or not such
withdrawal shall be made.
Sec. 54. NRS 548.525 is hereby amended to read as follows:
548.525 1. At any time after 5 years after the organization of
a district under the provisions of [this chapter,] NRS 548.010 to
548.550, inclusive, any 10 occupiers of land lying within the
boundaries of such district may file a petition with the Commission
praying that the operations of the district be terminated and the
existence of the district be discontinued.
2. The Commission may conduct such public meetings and
public hearings upon such petition as may be necessary to assist it in
the consideration thereof.
3. The Commission shall determine, on the basis of
information presented in the petition or brought out in public
hearings and on the basis of the number of petitioners in relation to
the total number of occupiers of land lying within the district,
whether it can render a reasonable determination of approval or
denial of the petition without holding a referendum, or whether a
referendum shall be held.
Sec. 55. NRS 548.530 is hereby amended to read as follows:
548.530 1. Within 60 days after a petition for discontinuance
has been received by the Commission, it shall give due notice of the
holding of the referendum if one is to be held.
-
*AB80_R1*

– 22 –
2. The Commission shall supervise the referendum and issue
appropriate regulations governing the conduct thereof.
3. The question shall be submitted by ballots upon which the
words “For terminating the existence of the ................ (name of the
conservation district to be here inserted)” and “Against terminating
the existence of the ............... (name of the conservation district to
be here inserted)” shall be printed, with a square before each
proposition and a direction to insert an X mark in the square before
one or the other of the propositions, as the voter may favor or
oppose discontinuance of such district.
4. All persons determined by the county clerk or clerks to be
registered voters residing within the district are eligible to vote in
such referendum.
5. No informalities in the conduct of such referendum or in any
matters relating thereto invalidate the referendum or the result
thereof if notice thereof was given substantially as provided in [this
chapter] the provisions of NRS 548.010 to 548.550, inclusive, and
the referendum was fairly conducted.
6. The Commission shall publish the result of the referendum.
Sec. 56. NRS 548.540 is hereby amended to read as follows:
548.540 The Commission shall not entertain petitions for the
discontinuance of any district, nor conduct referenda upon such
petitions, nor make any determination pursuant to such petitions in
accordance with the provisions of [this chapter,] NRS 548.010 to
548.550, inclusive, more often than once in 5 years.
Sec. 57. NRS 555.206 is hereby amended to read as follows:
555.206 1. If the area included in a weed control district is
entirely within the boundaries of one county and entirely within the
boundaries of one conservation district organized pursuant to
[chapter 548 of] NRS [,] 548.010 to 548.550, inclusive, the board of
county commissioners of the county and the supervisors of the
conservation district may enter into an agreement for the supervisors
of the conservation district to serve, ex officio, as the board of
directors of the weed control district. If, as a result of a change in
boundaries, the area included in a weed control district is no longer
entirely within the boundaries of one county and entirely within the
boundaries of one conservation district organized pursuant to
[chapter 548 of] NRS [,] 548.010 to 548.550, inclusive, the
supervisors of the conservation district may no longer serve, ex
officio, as the board of directors of the weed control district, and the
supervisors of the weed control district must be appointed pursuant
to NRS 555.205.
2. An agreement entered into pursuant to subsection 1 may be
terminated by mutual agreement of the board of county
commissioners and the supervisors of the conservation district. If an
-
*AB80_R1*

– 23 –
agreement is terminated pursuant to this section, the board of
directors of the weed control district must be appointed pursuant to
NRS 555.205.
3. The supervisors of a conservation district serving ex officio
as the board of directors of a weed control district pursuant to this
section shall ensure that any money collected by the weed control
district pursuant to an assessment levied pursuant to NRS 555.215,
and any other money appropriated or granted to the weed control
district from any source, is expended only for the purposes of NRS
555.202 to 555.220, inclusive.
Sec. 58. NRS 239.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
239.010 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 1.4683, 1.4687, 1A.110, 3.2203, 41.0397, 41.071, 49.095,
49.293, 62D.420, 62D.440, 62E.516, 62E.620, 62H.025, 62H.030,
62H.170, 62H.220, 62H.320, 75A.100, 75A.150, 76.160, 78.152,
80.113, 81.850, 82.183, 86.246, 86.54615, 87.515, 87.5413,
87A.200, 87A.580, 87A.640, 88.3355, 88.5927, 88.6067, 88A.345,
88A.7345, 89.045, 89.251, 90.730, 91.160, 116.757, 116A.270,
116B.880, 118B.026, 119.260, 119.265, 119.267, 119.280,
119A.280, 119A.653, 119A.677, 119B.370, 119B.382, 120A.640,
120A.690, 125.130, 125B.140, 126.141, 126.161, 126.163, 126.730,
127.007, 127.057, 127.130, 127.140, 127.2817, 128.090, 130.312,
130.712, 136.050, 159.044, 159A.044, 164.041, 172.075, 172.245,
176.01334, 176.01385, 176.015, 176.0625, 176.09129, 176.156,
176A.630, 178.39801, 178.4715, 178.5691, 178.5717, 179.495,
179A.070, 179A.165, 179D.160, 180.600, 200.3771, 200.3772,
200.5095, 200.604, 202.3662, 205.4651, 209.392, 209.3923,
209.3925, 209.419, 209.429, 209.521, 211A.140, 213.010, 213.040,
213.095, 213.131, 217.105, 217.110, 217.464, 217.475, 218A.350,
218E.625, 218F.150, 218G.130, 218G.240, 218G.350, 218G.615,
224.240, 226.462, 226.796, 228.270, 228.450, 228.495, 228.570,
231.069, 231.1285, 231.1473, 232.1369, 233.190, 237.300,
239.0105, 239.0113, 239.014, 239B.026, 239B.030, 239B.040,
239B.050, 239C.140, 239C.210, 239C.230, 239C.250, 239C.270,
239C.420, 240.007, 241.020, 241.030, 241.039, 242.105, 244.264,
244.335, 247.540, 247.545, 247.550, 247.560, 250.087, 250.130,
250.140, 250.145, 250.150, 268.095, 268.0978, 268.490, 268.910,
269.174, 271A.105, 281.195, 281.805, 281A.350, 281A.680,
281A.685, 281A.750, 281A.755, 281A.780, 284.4068, 284.4086,
286.110, 286.118, 287.0438, 289.025, 289.080, 289.387, 289.830,
293.4855, 293.5002, 293.503, 293.504, 293.558, 293.5757, 293.870,
293.906, 293.908, 293.909, 293.910, 293B.135, 293D.510, 331.110,
332.061, 332.351, 333.333, 333.335, 338.070, 338.1379, 338.1593,
338.1725, 338.1727, 348.420, 349.597, 349.775, 353.205,
353A.049, 353A.085, 353A.100, 353C.240, 353D.250, 360.240,
-
*AB80_R1*

– 24 –
360.247, 360.255, 360.755, 361.044, 361.2242, 361.610, 365.138,
366.160, 368A.180, 370.257, 370.327, 372A.080, 378.290, 378.300,
379.0075, 379.008, 379.1495, 385A.830, 385B.100, 387.626,
387.631, 388.1455, 388.259, 388.501, 388.503, 388.513, 388.750,
388A.247, 388A.249, 391.033, 391.035, 391.0365, 391.120,
391.925, 392.029, 392.147, 392.264, 392.271, 392.315, 392.317,
392.325, 392.327, 392.335, 392.850, 393.045, 394.167, 394.16975,
394.1698, 394.447, 394.460, 394.465, 396.1415, 396.1425, 396.143,
396.159, 396.3295, 396.405, 396.525, 396.535, 396.9685,
398A.115, 408.3885, 408.3886, 408.3888, 408.5484, 412.153,
414.280, 416.070, 422.2749, 422.305, 422A.342, 422A.350,
425.400, 427A.1236, 427A.872, 427A.940, 432.028, 432.205,
432B.175, 432B.280, 432B.290, 432B.4018, 432B.407, 432B.430,
432B.560, 432B.5902, 432C.140, 432C.150, 433.534, 433A.360,
439.4941, 439.4988, 439.5282, 439.840, 439.914, 439A.116,
439A.124, 439B.420, 439B.754, 439B.760, 439B.845, 440.170,
441A.195, 441A.220, 441A.230, 442.330, 442.395, 442.735,
442.774, 445A.665, 445B.570, 445B.7773, 449.209, 449.245,
449.4315, 449A.112, 450.140, 450B.188, 450B.805, 453.164,
453.720, 458.055, 458.280, 459.050, 459.3866, 459.555, 459.7056,
459.846, 463.120, 463.15993, 463.240, 463.3403, 463.3407,
463.790, 467.1005, 480.535, 480.545, 480.935, 480.940, 481.063,
481.091, 481.093, 482.170, 482.368, 482.5536, 483.340, 483.363,
483.575, 483.659, 483.800, 484A.469, 484B.830, 484B.833,
484E.070, 485.316, 501.344, 503.452, 522.040, 534A.031, 561.285,
571.160, 584.655, 587.877, 598.0964, 598.098, 598A.110,
598A.420, 599B.090, 603.070, 603A.210, 604A.303, 604A.710,
604D.500, 604D.600, 612.265, 616B.012, 616B.015, 616B.315,
616B.350, 618.341, 618.425, 622.238, 622.310, 623.131, 623A.137,
624.110, 624.265, 624.327, 625.425, 625A.185, 628.418, 628B.230,
628B.760, 629.043, 629.047, 629.069, 630.133, 630.2671,
630.2672, 630.2673, 630.2687, 630.30665, 630.336, 630A.327,
630A.555, 631.332, 631.368, 632.121, 632.125, 632.3415,
632.3423, 632.405, 633.283, 633.301, 633.427, 633.4715, 633.4716,
633.4717, 633.524, 634.055, 634.1303, 634.214, 634A.169,
634A.185, 634B.730, 635.111, 635.158, 636.262, 636.342, 637.085,
637.145, 637B.192, 637B.288, 638.087, 638.089, 639.183,
639.2485, 639.570, 640.075, 640.152, 640A.185, 640A.220,
640B.405, 640B.730, 640C.580, 640C.600, 640C.620, 640C.745,
640C.760, 640D.135, 640D.190, 640E.225, 640E.340, 641.090,
641.221, 641.2215, 641A.191, 641A.217, 641A.262, 641B.170,
641B.281, 641B.282, 641C.455, 641C.760, 641D.260, 641D.320,
642.524, 643.189, 644A.870, 645.180, 645.625, 645A.050,
645A.082, 645B.060, 645B.092, 645C.220, 645C.225, 645D.130,
645D.135, 645G.510, 645H.320, 645H.330, 647.0945, 647.0947,
-
*AB80_R1*

– 25 –
648.033, 648.197, 649.065, 649.067, 652.126, 652.228, 653.900,
654.110, 656.105, 657A.510, 661.115, 665.130, 665.133, 669.275,
669.285, 669A.310, 670B.680, 671.365, 671.415, 673.450, 673.480,
675.380, 676A.340, 676A.370, 677.243, 678A.470, 678C.710,
678C.800, 679B.122, 679B.124, 679B.152, 679B.159, 679B.190,
679B.285, 679B.690, 680A.270, 681A.440, 681B.260, 681B.410,
681B.540, 683A.0873, 685A.077, 686A.289, 686B.170, 686C.306,
687A.060, 687A.115, 687B.404, 687C.010, 688C.230, 688C.480,
688C.490, 689A.696, 692A.117, 692C.190, 692C.3507, 692C.3536,
692C.3538, 692C.354, 692C.420, 693A.480, 693A.615, 696B.550,
696C.120, 703.196, 704B.325, 706.1725, 706A.230, 710.159,
711.600, section 10 of this act, sections 35, 38 and 41 of chapter
478, Statutes of Nevada 2011 and section 2 of chapter 391, Statutes
of Nevada 2013 and unless otherwise declared by law to be
confidential, all public books and public records of a governmental
entity must be open at all times during office hours to inspection by
any person, and may be fully copied or an abstract or memorandum
may be prepared from those public books and public records. Any
such copies, abstracts or memoranda may be used to supply the
general public with copies, abstracts or memoranda of the records or
may be used in any other way to the advantage of the governmental
entity or of the general public. This section does not supersede or in
any manner affect the federal laws governing copyrights or enlarge,
diminish or affect in any other manner the rights of a person in any
written book or record which is copyrighted pursuant to federal law.
2. A governmental entity may not reject a book or record
which is copyrighted solely because it is copyrighted.
3. A governmental entity that has legal custody or control of a
public book or record shall not deny a request made pursuant to
subsection 1 to inspect or copy or receive a copy of a public book or
record on the basis that the requested public book or record contains
information that is confidential if the governmental entity can
redact, delete, conceal or separate, including, without limitation,
electronically, the confidential information from the information
included in the public book or record that is not otherwise
confidential.
4. If requested, a governmental entity shall provide a copy of a
public record in an electronic format by means of an electronic
medium. Nothing in this subsection requires a governmental entity
to provide a copy of a public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium if:
(a) The public record:
(1) Was not created or prepared in an electronic format; and
(2) Is not available in an electronic format; or
-
*AB80_R1*

– 26 –
(b) Providing the public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium would:
(1) Give access to proprietary software; or
(2) Require the production of information that is confidential
and that cannot be redacted, deleted, concealed or separated from
information that is not otherwise confidential.
5. An officer, employee or agent of a governmental entity who
has legal custody or control of a public record:
(a) Shall not refuse to provide a copy of that public record in the
medium that is requested because the officer, employee or agent has
already prepared or would prefer to provide the copy in a different
medium.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.030, shall, upon
request, prepare the copy of the public record and shall not require
the person who has requested the copy to prepare the copy himself
or herself.
Sec. 59. NRS 318A.280 is hereby amended to read as follows:
318A.280 1. In any region of this State for which there has
been established by interstate compact a regional planning agency,
the powers of any district created pursuant to this chapter with
respect to the location and construction of all facilities,
improvements or projects are subordinate to the powers of such
regional planning agency.
2. If the boundaries of a district overlap with the boundaries of
a conservation district formed pursuant to [chapter 548 of] NRS [,]
548.010 to 548.550, inclusive, the board of the district must
coordinate and consult with the board of supervisors of the
conservation district on matters that may impact the conservation
district.
Sec. 60. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 60.3. Beginning on January 1, 2036, the State
Conservation Commission in the State Department of Conservation
and Natural Resources shall study the results of the Healthy Soils
Initiative created by section 7 of this act to determine whether the
Initiative has made significant progress toward achieving the
requirements of subsection 1 of section 7 of this act, as determined
by the State Conservation Commission, and submit to the Director
of the Legislative Counsel Bureau, for transmittal to the next regular
session of the Legislature, a written report which must detail the
progress made toward meeting the requirements of subsection 1 of
section 7 of this act. If the Commission determines that there has not
been significant progress, the Commission shall:
1. Establish additional measures set forth in subsection 2 of
section 7 of this act or section 8 of this act to meet the requirements
of subsection 1 of section 7 of this act; or
-
*AB80_R1*

– 27 –
2. Recommend to the Legislature in the written report that the
Legislature repeal the provisions of sections 1 to 61, inclusive, of
this act relating to the Healthy Soils Initiative.
Sec. 60.7. The provisions of NRS 218D.380 do not apply to
any provision of this act which adds or revises a requirement to
submit a report to the Legislature.
Sec. 61. 1. This section and section 60 of this act become
effective upon passage and approval.
2. Sections 1 to 59, inclusive, and 60.3 and 60.7 of this act
become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
H
-
*AB80_R1*